Louisiana, session 2026, SB424.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
6 Section 1. Code of Civil Procedure Art. 1313(E) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
7 Art. 1313. Service by mail, delivery, or electronic means
8 * * *
9 E. For the purposes of this Article, "counsel of record" means a counsel
10 who has enrolled in the action for a party.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.